North Carolina, session 2025, HB835.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.58. Asian American and Pacific Islander education.
The standard course of study shall include the requirement that courses from elementary
school through high school include age-appropriate units on the impact of Asian Americans and
Pacific Islanders on American history. The units shall include, but not be limited to, the following
topics:
(1) The early contributions of Asian immigrants as farmers, miners, fishermen,
factory workers, and laborers who helped build the transcontinental railroad.
(2) The challenges and struggles that Asian immigrants have endured and
persevered throughout the history of the United States.
(3) The role of Asian Americans in the Civil Rights Movement of the 1960s in
the United States.
(4) The role of Asian Americans as the fastest growing minority group in the
United States.
(5) The contribution of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders in government, the
arts and sciences, and economic, cultural, social, and political developments
in North Carolina and the United States."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to courses taught
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
*H835-v-1*